Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska16-697.01
Parks, recreational facilities, and public grounds; acquisition; control.

Any city of the first class is hereby authorized and empowered to take land in fee, within or without its corporate limits, by donation, gift, devise, purchase, or appropriation, and to hold, improve and control such land for parks, recreational facilities, and public grounds. The jurisdiction and police power of the mayor and city council of any city that shall acquire any such real estate shall be at once extended over such real estate. The mayor and city council shall have power to enact bylaws, rules, and ordinances for the protection, preservation, and control of any real estate acquired under this section and provide suitable penalties for the violation of any such bylaws, rules, or ordinances.

Laws 1899, c. 15, § 1, p. 80;

R.S.1913, § 5271;

C.S.1922, § 4490;

C.S.1929, § 19-101;

R.S.1943, § 19-101;

Laws 1969, c. 86, § 6, p. 433;

Laws 2016, LB704, § 157.